Utah statutes.
23-28-301.   Farmland Assessment Act.
(1)  Creation of a migratory bird production area does not impair the ability
of land within the migratory bird production area to qualify for the benefits
of Title 59, Chapter 2, Part 5, Farmland Assessment Act.
(2)  The eligibility of land for the benefits of Title 59, Chapter 2, Part 5,
Farmland Assessment Act, is determined exclusively by the provisions of that
act, notwithstanding the land's location within a migratory bird production
area.
